Ohio, session 136, SB337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 1345.29 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 1345.29. (A) A supplier shall provide prominent, written disclosure at the point of sale of any fees or surcharges for using a credit card as a part of, or in relation to, a consumer transaction. (B)(1) A failure to comply with division (A) of this section shall be considered an unfair and deceptive practice under section 1345.02 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) All powers and remedies available to the attorney general to enforce sections 1345.01 to 1345.13 of the Revised Code as regards an unfair or deceptive act or practice are available to the attorney general to enforce division (A) of this section. (b) All remedies available to consumers under section 1345.09 of the Revised Code to remedy violations of section 1345.02 of the Revised Code are available to consumers to remedy a failure to comply with division (A) of this section. (C) As used in this section, "consumer," "consumer transaction," and "supplier" have the same meanings as in section 1345.01 of the Revised Code.